Utah statutes.
76-9-107.   Unauthorized entry of school bus -- Posting of warning on school
buses.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Driver" means the driver of the school bus.
(b)  "School bus" means every publicly or privately owned motor vehicle
designed for transporting ten or more passengers and operated for the
transportation of children to or from school or school activities.
(2)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person:
(a)  enters a school bus with the intent to commit a criminal offense;
(b)  enters a school bus and disrupts or interferes with the driver; or
(c)  enters a school bus and refuses to leave the bus after being ordered to
leave by the driver and the person:
(i)  is not a peace officer acting within the scope of his or her authority as
a peace officer;
(ii)  is not authorized by the school district to board the bus as a student
or as an individual employed by the school district or volunteering as a
participant in a school activity;
(iii)  causes or attempts to cause a disruption or an annoyance to any
passenger on the bus; or
(iv)  is reckless as to whether the person's presence or behavior will cause
fear on the part of any passenger on the bus.
(3)  Each school district shall ensure that clearly legible signs be placed on
each school bus,  next to each entrance to the bus, warning that unauthorized
entry of a school bus is a violation of state law.
